Hawaii, session 2026, GM1327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that when an individual
is charged under both federal and state law, the federal
investigation and prosecution of that individual takes
precedence over those of the State. In the event that the
length or outcome of a federal investigation precludes the
statute of limitations for the prosecution of a crime under
state law, the indicted may avoid prosecution in the State,
resulting in a miscarriage of justice. Bribery, for example, is
a class B felony, and generally, state law provides for a
statute of limitations of three years for class B felonies.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a
statute of limitations of nine years for a bribery offense.
SECTION 2. Section 710-1040, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§710-1040 Bcibexy. (1) A person commits the offense of
bribery if:
2026-2420 SB2494 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiBimiiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiH

Page 2
S.B. NO.
(a) The person confers, or offers or agrees to confer,
directly or indirectly, any pecuniary benefit upon a
public servant with the intent to influence the public
servant’s vote, opinion, judgment, exercise of
discretion, or other action in the public servant's
official capacity; or
(b) While a public servant, the person solicits, accepts,
or agrees to accept, directly or indirectly, any
pecuniary benefit with the intent that the person's
vote, opinion, judgment, exercise of discretion, or
other action as a public servant will thereby be
influenced.
(2) It is a defense to a prosecution under subsection (1)
that the accused conferred or agreed to confer the pecuniary
benefit as a result of extortion or coercion.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "public servant"
includes in addition to persons who occupy the position of
public servant as defined in section [-[■] 710-1000 [•]-] , persons who
have been elected, appointed, or designated to become a public
servant although not yet occupying that position.
2026-2420 SB2494 CDl SMA.docx 2
HIIIIHHIIHIIIIIIIiHlin

Pages S.B. NO. STi
(4) Bribery is a class B felony. A person convicted of
violating this section, notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
shall not be eligible for a deferred acceptance of guilty plea
or nolo contendere plea under chapter 853.
(5) Notwithstanding section 701-108 and any law to the
contrary, prosecution for an offense under subsection (1) shall
be commenced within nine years from the date the offense is
committed."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2420 SB2494 CDl SMA.docx 3
iiiiiiiiHiiiiiiHiininiw

S.B. NO. ""
APPROVED this 10th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B.No. 2494, H.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 1, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President ofihe'Seriate
Clerk of the enate
12-26

SB No. 2494, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine-K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives